Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.030

Enforcement—Director's duties—Rules.

(1) The director shall enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt the necessary rules to carry out its purpose.

(2) The director shall, whenever he or she considers the adoption of rules or amendments to existing rules, consult with growers, associations of growers or other industry associations, or other persons affected by such rules or amendments.

[ 1998 c 154 s 3; 1963 c 122 s 3.]